Utah statutes.
58-3a-301.    Licensure required -- License classifications.

(1)  A license is required to engage in the practice of architecture, except as specifically provided in Section 58-3a-304 or 58-1-307.

(2)  The division shall issue a license in the classification of architect to a person who qualifies under this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 260, 1996 General Session

